Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB628.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(b) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.--* * *(b) As used in this act:* * *"Food allergen" means any of the following:(1) Milk.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (2) Eggs.(3) Fish.(4) Shellfish.(5) Tree nuts.(6) Peanuts.(7) Wheat.(8) Soybeans.(9) Sesame."Gluten-containing grain" means any of the following grains or a crossbred hybrid of any of the following grains:(1) wheat, including any species belonging to the genus Triticum;(2) rye, including any species belonging to the genus Secale;(3) barley, including any species belonging to the genus Hordeum; or(4) oat, including any species belonging to the genus Avena sativa.* * *Section 2. Section 8 of the act is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 8. Misbranding.--A controlled substance, other drug or device or cosmetic shall be deemed to be misbranded:* * *(13) If it is an oral controlled substance or other oral drug containing an ingredient derived directly or indirectly from a gluten-containing grain or food allergen, unless its label bears a statement that the drug contains the ingredient and identifies the ingredient and type of gluten-containing grain from which the ingredient is derived.20250SB0628PN0622 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect in two years.20250SB0628PN0622 - 3 - 1